Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Licensing of Bus Drivers

§ 21-27-151.
Obtaining permit; appeal from refusal to grant permit.

No person may drive or operate any bus of a transportation system for the transportation of passengers within any city or town in this state, where the operation of such bus is subject to regulation by the authorities of such city or town under Section 21-27-121, unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows: he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen years, an experienced driver, of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle. The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant. If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a license, signed by the mayor, together with a metallic badge, which shall have a number and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation. The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than five hundred dollars, to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, not to exceed five dollars for such license, which said license fee shall be paid into the general fund of such municipality. In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such license to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-143.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 543, §§ 1-4.

§ 21-27-153.
Transfer of badge unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any driver who secures such license and badge to transfer such license or badge to any other driver, or for any person to use the license or badge of another person while driving or operating such bus.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-143.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 543, §§ 1-4.

§ 21-27-155.
Revocation or suspension of permit.

The governing authority of the municipality may revoke or suspend such license and demand the return of such badge upon proof that the holder while driving, or while in charge of such motor vehicle:

was intoxicated, or noticeably under the influence of intoxicating liquor; or,

had disturbed the peace while so engaged; or,

had recklessly disregarded the speed regulations prescribed by law; or,

had carried concealed weapons in violation of law.

The said authority may by ordinance prescribe other reasonable rules and regulations governing the use and operation of such bus within the municipality, and cause the same to be observed by such driver or operator, under penalty of revocation or suspension of such license. Any person whose license to drive or operate such bus has been suspended or revoked may appeal to the circuit court from such order in the manner provided for appeals from orders of the governing authority of municipalities, but such appeal shall not operate as a supersedeas of said order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-143.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 543, §§ 1-4.